Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202532-402
Other primary election; when held.

Any primary election other than a primary election provided for in sections 14-201 and 32-401 shall be held on Tuesday four weeks before the general election.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 94;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 32.